Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 5 Georgia Bureau of Investigation Nomenclature

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides a statement of public policy relating to the prohibition of unauthorized use of Department of Public Safety and Georgia Bureau of Investigation Nomenclature or symbols.

35-3-100.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Bureau of Investigation Nomenclature Act of 1995.”

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.

35-3-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Badge” means any official badge used by employees of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, either in the past or currently.

“Bureau” means the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, its divisions, or operations under its command.

“Director” means the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“Emblem” means any official patch or other emblem worn currently or formerly or used by the Investigative Division, the Division of Forensic Sciences, the Georgia Crime Information Center, or any other division or operation under the command of the bureau to identify the bureau or its employees.

“Person” means any person, corporation, organization, or political subdivision of the State of Georgia.

“Seal” means any official symbol, mark, or abbreviation which represents and is used by the Investigative Division, the Division of Forensic Sciences, the Georgia Crime Information Center, or any other division or operation under the command of the bureau to identify the bureau or its employees.

“Willful violator” means any person who knowingly violates the provisions of this article. Any person who violates this article after being advised in writing by the director that such person’s activity is in violation of this article shall be considered a willful violator and shall be considered in willful violation of this article. Any person whose agent or representative is a willful violator and who has knowledge of the violation by the agent or representative shall also be considered a willful violator and in willful violation of this article unless, upon learning of the violation, he or she immediately terminates the agency or other relationship with such violator.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 626, § 1.

35-3-102.
Permission required for use of bureau nomenclature.

Whoever, except with the written permission of the director, knowingly uses the words “Georgia Bureau of Investigation,” “GBI,” “agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation,” “Division of Forensic Sciences,” “DOFS,” “Georgia Crime Information Center,” “GCIC,” or “State Crime Lab” in referring to Georgia’s state crime lab in connection with any advertisement, circular, book, pamphlet, or other publication, play, motion picture, broadcast, telecast, or other production in a manner reasonably calculated to convey the impression that such advertisement, circular, book, pamphlet, or other publication, play, motion picture, broadcast, telecast, or other production is approved, endorsed, or authorized by or associated with the bureau shall be in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 626, § 2.

35-3-103.
Permission required for use of bureau symbols.

Any person who uses or displays any symbol, including any emblem, seal, or badge, current or historical, used by the bureau without written permission from the director shall be in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.

35-3-104.
Procedures for seeking permission to use bureau nomenclature or symbols.

Any person wishing permission to use either bureau nomenclature or symbols may request such permission in writing to the director. The director shall serve notice on the requesting party within 15 calendar days after receipt of the request of his or her decision on whether the person may use the nomenclature or the symbol. If the director does not respond within the 15 day time period, then the request is presumed to have been denied. The grant of permission under Code Section 35-3-102 or 35-3-103 shall be in the discretion of the director under such conditions as the director may impose. If the director denies such request and the person making such request reasonably believes that the director has acted in bad faith or based on an illegal motive, then the person may, within 15 days after the person’s request was denied or granted on limited terms, file an appeal with the Board of Public Safety. The matter will then be considered before the board, but the burden will be with the person making the request to show that the request was improperly denied or limited.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.

35-3-105.
Injunction against violations.

Whenever there shall be an actual or threatened violation of Code Section 35-3-102 or 35-3-103, the director shall have the right to apply to the Superior Court of Fulton County or to the superior court of the county of residence of the violator for an injunction to restrain the violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.

35-3-106.
Civil penalties.

In addition to any other relief or sanction for a violation of Code Section 35-3-102 or 35-3-103, where the violation is willful, the director shall be entitled to collect a civil penalty in the amount of $500.00 for each violation. Further, when there is a finding of willful violation, the director shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees for bringing any action against the violator. The director shall be entitled to seek civil sanctions in the Superior Court of Fulton County or in the county of residence of the violator.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.

35-3-107.
Damage suits against violators.

Any person who has given money or any other item of value to another person due in part to such person’s use of bureau nomenclature or symbols in violation of this article may maintain a suit for damages against the violator. Where it is proven that the violation was willful, the victim shall be entitled to recover treble damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-107

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.

35-3-108.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to a fine of not less than $1,000.00 nor more than $5,000.00 or to imprisonment for not less than one and not more than five years, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-108

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 3.